test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-vuallget_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - vuällget: # Verb 'drive, travel, go'
     vuällget+V+Inf: vuällget
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuolgáv
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuolgá
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuallgá
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vullgin
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: [vuällgebehtin, vuällgebähtten]
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: [vuällgeba, vuällgeban]
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vuällgep
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: [vuällgebehtit, vuällgebähttet]
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vullgi

     vuällget+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vullgiv
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vullgi
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vulgij
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vulgijmen
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vulgijden
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [vulgijga, vulgijgan]
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vulgijme
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vulgijde
     vuällget+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vullgin

     vuällget+V+Imprt+Sg2: vuolge  
     vuällget+V+Imprt+Du2: vuällgen
     vuällget+V+Imprt+Pl2: vullgit

     vuällget+V+ConNeg: vuolge 
     vuällget+V+GerII: vuällgemin
     vuällget+V+PrfPrc: vuallgám

#     vuällget+V+Pot+Sg1: vulgitjav
#     vuällget+V+Pot+Sg2: vulgitja
#     vuällget+V+Pot+Sg3: vulgitj
#     vuällget+V+Pot+Du1: vulgitjin
#     vuällget+V+Pot+Du2: vulgitjiehpin
#     vuällget+V+Pot+Du2: vulgitjähppen
#     vuällget+V+Pot+Du3: vulgitjiebá
#     vuällget+V+Pot+Pl1: vulgitjip
#     vuällget+V+Pot+Pl2: vulgitjihpit
#     vuällget+V+Pot+Pl3: vulgitji
